Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 12. Mergers and Share Exchanges.

§ 13.1-715.1.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Acquired entity”
means the domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will have all of one or more classes or series of shares or eligible interests acquired in a share exchange.

“Acquiring entity”
means the domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will acquire all of one or more classes or series of shares or eligible interests of the acquired entity in a share exchange.

“Merger”
means a business combination pursuant to §

13.1-716

.

“New interest holder liability”
means interest holder liability of a person, resulting from a merger or share exchange, that is (i) in respect of an entity which is different from the entity in which the person held shares or eligible interests immediately before the merger or share exchange became effective or (ii) in respect of the same entity as the one in which the person held shares or eligible interests immediately before the merger or share exchange became effective if (a) the person did not have interest holder liability immediately before the merger or share exchange became effective or (b) the person had interest holder liability immediately before the merger or share exchange became effective, the terms and conditions of which were changed when the merger or share exchange became effective.

“Party to a merger”
means any domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will merge under a plan of merger. “Party to a merger” does not include a survivor created by the merger.

“Party to a share exchange”
means any domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that is an acquired entity or an acquiring entity under a plan of share exchange.

“Survivor”
in a merger means the domestic or foreign corporation or the eligible entity into which one or more other domestic or foreign corporations or eligible entities are merged. A survivor of a merger may preexist the merger or be created by the merger.

History.

2005, c. 765; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to merger and share exchange by state banks, see §

6.2-822

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 substituted “Mergers and Share Exchanges” for “Merger and Share Exchange” in the article heading.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 inserted the definitions for “Acquired entity,” “Acquiring entity,” “New interest holder liability,” and “Party to a share exchange”; inserted the second sentence in the definition of “Party to a merger”;
and deleted the definition of “Share exchange,” which read: “ ‘Share exchange’ means a business combination pursuant to §

13.1-717

.”

§ 13.1-716.
Merger.

One or more domestic corporations may merge with one or more domestic or foreign corporations or eligible entities pursuant to a plan of merger, or two or more foreign corporations or domestic or foreign eligible entities may merge, resulting in a survivor that is a domestic corporation created in the merger.

A foreign corporation or a foreign eligible entity may be a party to a merger with a domestic corporation, or may be created as the survivor of a merger in which a domestic corporation is a party, but only if the merger is permitted by the organic law of the foreign corporation or eligible entity.

The plan of merger shall include:

As to each party to the merger, its name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity;

The survivor’s name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity and, if the survivor is to be created in the merger, a statement to that effect;

The terms and conditions of the merger;

The manner and basis of converting the shares of each merging domestic or foreign corporation and eligible interests of each merging domestic or foreign eligible entity into shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, or other property or any combination of the foregoing;

The manner and basis of converting any rights to acquire the shares of each merging domestic or foreign corporation and eligible interests of each merging domestic or foreign eligible entity into shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, or other property or any combination of the foregoing;

Any amendment of the articles of incorporation of the survivor that is a domestic corporation or if the articles of incorporation are amended and restated, as an attachment to the plan, the survivor’s restated articles of incorporation, or if a new domestic corporation is to be created by the merger, as an attachment to the plan, the survivor’s articles of incorporation; and

Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the merger is organized or by which it is governed, or by the articles of incorporation or organic rules of any such party.

In addition to the requirements of subsection C, a plan of merger may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

Terms of a plan of merger may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with subsection L of §

13.1-604

.

Unless the plan of merger provides otherwise, the plan of merger may be amended prior to the effective date of the certificate of merger, but if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party to the merger are required by any provision of this chapter to vote on the plan, the plan may not be amended subsequent to approval of the plan by such shareholders to change any of the following, unless the amendment is subject to the approval of the shareholders:

The amount or kind of shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash or other property to be received under the plan by the shareholders of or holders of eligible interests in any party to the merger;

The articles of incorporation of any domestic corporation that will be the survivor of the merger, except for changes permitted by §

13.1-706

; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders in any material respect.

One or more domestic corporations may merge pursuant to this section into another domestic corporation if the articles of incorporation of each of them could lawfully contain all the corporate powers and purposes of all of them.

Any corporation authorized by its articles of incorporation to engage in a special kind of business enumerated in §

13.1-620

may be merged with another corporation authorized by its articles of incorporation to engage in the same special kind of business, including mergers authorized under §

6.2-1146

, whether or not either or both of such corporations are actually engaged in the transaction of such business, and the shareholders of the corporations parties to the merger may receive shares of a corporation not authorized by its articles of incorporation to engage in such special kind of business.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-68; 1956, c. 428; 1968, c. 111; 1973, c. 441; 1975, c. 500; 1980, c. 90; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 228; 2005, c. 765; 2006, c. 663; 2008, c. 509; 2009, c. 216; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to merger and share exchange by state banks, see §

6.2-822

.

Editor’s note.

Effective October 1, 2010, “§

6.2-1146

” was substituted for “§ 6.1-194.40,” to conform to the recodification of Title 6.1 by Acts 2010, c. 794.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote subsections A through C and added subsections D
and E.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663 added subdivision F 1 and redesignated former subsection F as subdivision F 2.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 509 inserted the last sentence in subsection A.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 216 inserted “and amendment of the plan is not conditioned on unanimous shareholder approval” in the introductory language of subsection E.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “or foreign corporation or eligible entity to be created in the merger” for “corporation to be created in the merger in the manner provided in this chapter” in subsection A; and in subsection E, substituted “by any provision of this chapter” for “or permitted” and “the plan may not be amended” for “and amendment of the plan is not conditioned on unanimous shareholder approval, the plan must provide that” and “to change any of the following, unless the amendment is approved by the shareholders” for “the plan may not be amended to change.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subsection A, substituted “merge, resulting in a survivor that is a domestic corporation created” for “merge into a new domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity to be created”; in subsection B, substituted “as the survivor of a merger in which a domestic corporation is a party, but,” substituted “organic law of” for “laws under which,” and deleted “is organized or by which it is governed”; rewrote subdivision C 1, which read: “The name of each domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will merge and the name of the domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that will be the survivor of the merger”; added subdivision C 2; redesignated former subdivisions C 2 through 4 as C 3 through 5, respectively; deleted former subdivision C 5, which read: “The articles of incorporation of any domestic or foreign corporation or nonstock corporation, or the organic document of any domestic or foreign unincorporated entity, to be created by the merger, or if a new domestic or foreign corporation or nonstock corporation or unincorporated entity is not to be created by the merger, any amendments to the survivor’s articles of incorporation or organic document; and”; added subdivision C 6; redesignated former subdivision C 6 as C 7; in subdivision C 7, substituted “rules” for “document”; added subsection D; redesignated former subsection D through subdivision F 2 as subsections E through H, respectively; in subsection F, substituted “Unless the plan of merger provides otherwise, the plan of merger may” for “The plan of merger may also include a provision that the plan may,” and substituted “subject to the approval of” for “approved by”; and rewrote subdivision F 2, which read: “The articles of incorporation of any domestic or foreign corporation or nonstock corporation, or the organic document of any unincorporated entity, that will survive or be created as a result of the merger, except for changes permitted by §

13.1-706

; or”; updated an internal reference; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, deleted the second sentence of subsection A, which read “When a domestic corporation is the survivor of a merger with a domestic nonstock corporation, it may become, pursuant to subdivision C 6, a domestic nonstock corporation, provided that the only parties to the merger are domestic corporations and domestic nonstock corporations”; and substituted “holders” for “owners” in subdivision F 1. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “The New Virginia Stock Corporation Act: A Primer,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 67 (1985).

For annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 307 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

4B M.J. Corporations, §§ 249, 250.

§ 13.1-717.
Share exchange.

Through a share exchange:

A domestic corporation may acquire all of the shares of one or more classes or series of shares of another domestic or foreign corporation, or all of the eligible interests of one or more classes or series of eligible interests of a domestic or foreign eligible entity, as well as rights to acquire any such shares or eligible interests, in exchange for shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of share exchange; or

All of the shares of one or more classes or series of shares of a domestic corporation, as well as rights to acquire any such shares, may be acquired by another domestic or foreign corporation or other eligible entity, in exchange for shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing, pursuant to a plan of share exchange.

A foreign corporation or eligible entity may be a party to a share exchange only if the share exchange is permitted by the organic law under which the corporation or eligible entity is organized or by which it is governed.

If the organic law or organic rules of a domestic eligible entity do not provide procedures for the approval of a share exchange, a plan of share exchange may be adopted and approved, and the share exchange effectuated, in accordance with the procedures, if any, for a merger.

The plan of share exchange shall include:

The name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of each acquired entity and the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the acquiring entity;

The terms and conditions of the share exchange;

The manner and basis of exchanging shares of a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible interests in a domestic or foreign eligible entity whose shares or eligible interests will be acquired under the share exchange into shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing;

The manner and basis for exchanging any rights to acquire shares of a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible interests in a domestic or foreign eligible entity whose shares or eligible interests will be acquired under the share exchange into shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property or any combination of the foregoing; and

Any other provisions required by the organic law governing any foreign corporation or eligible entity that is a party to the share exchange or its articles of incorporation or organic rules.

In addition to the requirements of subsection D, the plan of share exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.

Terms of a plan of share exchange may be made dependent on facts objectively ascertainable outside the plan in accordance with subsection L of §

13.1-604

.

Unless the plan of share exchange provides otherwise, the plan of share exchange may be amended prior to the effective date of the certificate of share exchange, but if the shareholders of a domestic corporation that is a party to the share exchange are required by any provision of this chapter to vote on the plan, the plan may not be amended subsequent to approval of the plan by such shareholders to change any of the following, unless the amendment is subject to the approval of the shareholders:

The amount or kind of shares or other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, or other property or any combination of the foregoing to be issued by the corporation or to be received under the plan by the shareholders, of the acquired entity; or

Any of the other terms or conditions of the plan if the change would adversely affect such shareholders in any material respect.

This section does not limit the power of a domestic corporation to acquire shares of another domestic or foreign corporation or eligible interests in an eligible entity in a transaction other than a share exchange.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-69.1; 1975, c. 500; 1980, c. 90; 1985, c. 522; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734.

Cross references.

As to share exchange of state banks, see §

6.2-822

.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 in subsection F, substituted “by any provision of this chapter” for “or permitted” and “may not be amended” for “must provide that” and “to change any of the following, unless the amendment is approved by the shareholders” for “the plan may not be amended to change.”

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734, in subdivision A 2, deleted “or eligible interests” following “such shares”; in subsection B, substituted “organic law” for “laws”; in subsection C, inserted “or organic rules” following “law”; rewrote subdivision D 1, which read: “The name of each domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity whose shares or eligible interests will be acquired and the name of the domestic or foreign corporation or other eligible entity that will acquire those shares or eligible interests” in subdivisions D 3 and 4, inserted “domestic or foreign” preceding “eligible entity”; rewrote subdivision D 5, which read: “Any other provisions required by the laws under which any party to the share exchange is organized or by the articles of incorporation or organic document of any such party”; added subsection E; redesignated former subsections E through G as F through H, respectively; in subsection G, substituted “Unless the plan of share exchange provides otherwise, the plan of share exchange may be” for “The plan of share exchange may also include a provision that the plan may be,” and substituted “subject to the approval of” for “approved by”; and in subdivision G 1, substituted “the acquired entity” for “or owners of eligible interests in any party to the share exchange”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 13.1-718.
Action on a plan of merger or share exchange.

Subject to the provisions of subdivision F 4, in the case of a domestic corporation that is (i) a party to a merger, (ii) an acquired entity in a share exchange, or (iii) the acquiring entity in a share exchange:

The plan of merger or share exchange shall first be adopted by the board of directors.

Except as provided in subsections F and G and in §§

13.1-719

and

13.1-719.1

, after adopting the plan of merger or share exchange the board of directors shall submit the plan to the shareholders for their approval. The board of directors shall also transmit to the shareholders a recommendation that the shareholders approve the plan or, in the case of an offer referred to in subsection G, that the shareholders tender their shares to the offeror in response to the offer, unless the board of directors makes a determination that because of conflicts of interest or other special circumstances it should not make such a recommendation, in which case the board of directors shall inform the shareholders of the basis for that determination.

The board of directors may set conditions for the approval of the plan of merger or share exchange by the shareholders or the effectiveness of the plan of merger or share exchange.

If the plan of merger or share exchange is required to be approved by the shareholders, and if the approval is to be given at a meeting, the corporation shall notify each shareholder, whether or not entitled to vote, of the meeting of shareholders at which the plan is to be submitted for approval. The notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the plan and shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the plan. If the corporation is to be merged into an existing domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity and its shareholders are to receive shares or other eligible interests or the right to receive shares or other eligible interests in the survivor, the notice shall also include or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or organic rules of the survivor. If the corporation is to be merged into a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity and a new domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity is to be created pursuant to the merger, the notice shall include or be accompanied by a copy or a summary of the articles of incorporation and bylaws or organic rules of the new corporation or eligible entity.

Unless the articles of incorporation, or the board of directors acting pursuant to subsection B, require a greater vote, approval of the plan of merger or share exchange requires the approval of each voting group entitled to vote on the plan by more than two-thirds of all the votes entitled to be cast by that voting group. The articles of incorporation may provide for a greater or lesser vote than that provided for in this subsection or a vote by separate voting groups so long as the vote provided for is not less than a majority of all the votes cast on the plan by each voting group entitled to vote on the plan of merger or share exchange at a meeting at which a quorum of the voting group exists.

Separate voting by voting groups is required:

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, on a plan of merger by each class or series of shares that:

Is to be converted under the plan of merger into shares, other securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights to acquire shares, other securities or eligible interests, cash, other property, or any combination of the foregoing, or is proposed to be eliminated without being converted into any of the foregoing; or

Would be entitled to vote as a separate group on a provision in the plan that, if contained in a proposed amendment to articles of incorporation, would require action by separate voting groups under §

13.1-708

;

Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, on a plan of share exchange, by each class or series of shares included in the exchange, with each class or series constituting a separate voting group;

On a plan of merger, if the voting group is entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote as a voting group to approve a plan of merger; and

On a plan of share exchange, if the voting group is entitled under the articles of incorporation to vote as a voting group to approve a plan of share exchange.

Unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide, approval by the corporation’s shareholders of a plan of merger or share exchange is not required if:

The corporation will survive the merger or is the acquiring corporation in a share exchange;

Except for amendments permitted by §

13.1-706

, its articles of incorporation will not be changed;

Each shareholder of the corporation whose shares were outstanding immediately before the effective time of the merger or share exchange will hold the same number of shares, with identical preferences, limitations, and rights immediately after the effective time of the merger or share exchange; and

With respect to shares of the surviving corporation in a merger or the shares of the acquiring entity in a share exchange entity that are entitled to vote unconditionally in the election of directors, the number of shares outstanding immediately after the merger or share exchange, plus the number of shares issuable as a result of the merger or share exchange, either by the conversion of securities issued pursuant to the merger or share exchange or the exercise of options, rights, and warrants issued pursuant to the merger or share exchange, will not exceed by more than 20 percent the total number of shares of the surviving corporation outstanding immediately before the merger or share exchange.

Unless the articles of incorporation otherwise provide, approval by the corporation’s shareholders of a plan of merger or share exchange is not required if:

The plan of merger or share exchange expressly (i) permits or requires such a merger or share exchange to be effected under this subsection and (ii) provides that such merger or share exchange be effected as soon as practicable following the consummation of the offer referred to in subdivision 3 if such merger or share exchange is effected under this subsection;

Another party to the merger, the acquiring entity in the share exchange, or a parent of another party to the merger or the acquiring entity in the share exchange, makes an offer to purchase, on the terms provided in the plan of merger or share exchange, any and all of the outstanding shares of the corporation that, absent this subsection, would be entitled to vote on the plan of merger or share exchange, except that the offer may exclude shares of the corporation that are owned at the commencement of the offer by the corporation, the offeror, or any parent of the offeror, or by any wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing;

The offer discloses that the plan of merger or share exchange provides that the merger or share exchange will be effected as soon as practicable following the satisfaction of the requirement set forth in subdivision 6 and that the shares of the corporation that are not tendered in response to the offer will be treated as set forth in subdivision 8;

The offer remains open for at least 10 business days;

The offeror purchases all shares properly tendered in response to the offer and not properly withdrawn;

The shares listed below are collectively entitled to cast at least the minimum number of votes on the merger or share exchange that, absent this subsection, would be required by this chapter and by the articles of incorporation for the approval of the merger or share exchange by the shareholders and by any other voting group entitled to vote on the merger or share exchange at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote on the approval were present and voted:

Shares purchased by the offeror in accordance with the offer;

Shares otherwise owned by the offeror or by any parent of the offeror or any wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing; and

Shares subject to an agreement that they are to be transferred, contributed, or delivered to the offeror, any parent of the offeror, or any wholly owned subsidiary of any of the foregoing in exchange for shares or eligible interests in such offeror, parent, or subsidiary;

The offeror or a wholly owned subsidiary of the offeror merges with or into, or effects a share exchange in which it acquires shares of, the corporation; and

Each outstanding share of each class or series of shares of the corporation that the offeror is offering to purchase in accordance with the offer, and that is not purchased in accordance with the offer, is to be converted in the merger into, or into the right to receive, or is to be exchanged in the share exchange for, or for the right to receive, the same amount and kind of securities, eligible interests, obligations, rights, cash, or other property to be paid or exchanged in accordance with the offer for each share of that class or series of shares that is tendered in response to the offer, except that shares of the corporation that are owned by the corporation or that are described in subdivision 6 a or c need not be converted into or exchanged for the consideration described in this subdivision.

As used in subsections G and K:“Offer” means the offer referred to in subdivision 3.“Offeror” means the person making the offer.“Parent” of any entity means a person that owns, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly owned subsidiaries, all of the outstanding shares or eligible interests in that entity.“Wholly owned subsidiary” of a person means an entity of or in which that person owns, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly owned subsidiaries, all of the outstanding shares or eligible interests.

If a corporation has not yet issued shares and its articles of incorporation do not otherwise provide, its board of directors may adopt and approve a plan of merger or share exchange on behalf of the corporation without shareholder action.

If as a result of a merger or share exchange one or more shareholders of a domestic corporation would become subject to new interest holder liability, approval of the plan of merger or share exchange requires the signing in connection with the transaction, by each such shareholder, of a separate written consent to become subject to such new interest holder liability, unless in the case of a shareholder that already has interest holder liability with respect to such domestic corporation, (i) the new interest holder liability is with respect to a domestic or foreign corporation, which may be a different or the same domestic corporation in which the person is a shareholder, and (ii) the terms and conditions of the new interest holder liability are substantially identical to those of the existing interest holder liability, other than for changes that eliminate or reduce such interest holder liability.

Shares tendered in response to an offer shall be deemed, for purposes of subsection G, to have been purchased in accordance with the offer at the earliest time as of which the offeror has irrevocably accepted those shares for payment and either (i) in the case of shares represented by certificates, the offeror, or the offeror’s designated depository or other agent, has physically received the certificates representing those shares or (ii) in the case of shares without certificates, those shares have been transferred into the account of the offeror or its designated depository or other agent, or an agent’s message relating to those shares has been received by the offeror or its designated depository or other agent.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-70; 1956, c. 428; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1991, c. 109; 2005, c. 765; 2006, cc. 363, 663; 2007, c. 165; 2010, c. 782; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to merger or transfer of assets of insolvent bank, see §

6.2-914

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 734, cl. 4, as amended by Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 5 provides: “That until July 1, 2021, the term ‘conversion,’ when used in any provision of the first enactment of this act, shall be construed to mean ‘entity conversion.’ ”

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 363 substituted “of this section and in §§

13.1-719

and

13.1-719.1

” for “and in §

13.1-719

” in subdivision A 2.

The 2006 amendment by c. 663, in subsection C, substituted “shares or other interests or the right to receive shares or other interests in the surviving” for “capital stock or other interests in the surviving” in the third and fourth sentences; and added subdivision F 4 and made related changes.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 165, in subdivision A 2, substituted “in subsections F and G” for “in subsection F” in the first sentence and “shall transmit” for “must transmit” in the second sentence; substituted “shall contain” for “must contain” in the second sentence in subsection C; added present subsection G; and redesignated former subsection G as present subsection H.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 782 substituted “Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, on a plan” for “on a plan” in subdivision E 1; inserted “or is proposed to be eliminated without being converted into any of the foregoing” in subdivision E 1 a; and in subdivision E 3, deleted “merger or” preceding “share exchange” twice.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 substituted “F and H” for “F and G of this section” in subdivision A 2; substituted “Except as otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, on” for “On” in subdivision E 2; added subdivision E 3; redesignated former subdivision E 3 as subdivision E 4; twice substituted “effective time” for “effective date” in subdivision F 3; added subsection G; redesignated former subsections G and H as subsections H and I, respectively; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, redesignated subdivision G 9 as subsection H and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and updated internal references.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision G 3, substituted “subdivision 6” for “subdivision 7”; in subsection H, substituted “subsections G and K” for “subsection G”; and in subsection K, substituted “of subsection G” for “of this section.” For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For survey on business and corporate law in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 491 (1989).

For 2007 annual survey article, “Corporate and Business Law,” see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (2007).

For article, “Collaboration and Corporate Tax Avoidance,” see 76 Wash & Lee L. Rev. 93 (2019).

§ 13.1-719.
Merger between parent and subsidiary or between subsidiaries.

As used in this section:“Parent entity” means a domestic or foreign corporation or eligible entity that owns shares of a domestic corporation that possess at least 90 percent of the voting power of each class and series of the outstanding shares of the domestic corporation that have voting power.“Subsidiary” means the domestic corporation whose outstanding shares are owned by a parent entity.

A parent entity may merge (i) a subsidiary into itself or another subsidiary or (ii) itself into a subsidiary without the approval of the board of directors or the shareholders of any subsidiary and, if the parent entity is a domestic corporation, without the approval of the shareholders of the parent entity, unless the articles of incorporation of any subsidiary or the articles of incorporation or the organic rules of the parent entity otherwise provide.

A parent entity may be a foreign corporation or eligible entity only if the merger is permitted under the laws by which the foreign corporation or eligible entity is organized.

The parent entity shall, within 10 days after the effective date of the merger, notify each of the subsidiary’s shareholders that the merger has become effective.

Except as provided in subsections B and C, a merger under this section shall be governed by the provisions of this article applicable to mergers generally, including subsection J of §

13.1-718

.

The articles of incorporation of the survivor shall not be altered or amended by a merger pursuant to this section, except for amendments permitted by §

13.1-706

.

Two or more domestic corporations may be merged into a parent entity pursuant to this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 13.1-76; 1956, c. 428; 1964, c. 417; 1968, c. 115; 1975, c. 500; 1985, c. 522; 1990, c. 230; 2005, c. 765; 2015, c. 611; 2019, c. 734; 2020, c. 1226.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 1226, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective July 1, 2021.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 765 rewrote the section.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 611 added subsection B; redesignated former subsections B through E as subsections C through F; inserted “or B” following “A” in subsection C; substituted “A, B, and C” for “A and B” in subsection D; deleted “domestic” preceding “parent” in subsection F; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 734 rewrote the section.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1226, effective July 1, 2021, substituted “subsection J” for “subsection I” in subsection E.